Utah statutes.
77-7-26.   Improper disposition or cancellation of notice to appear or
traffic citation -- Official misconduct -- Misdemeanor.
(1) (a)  It is unlawful and official misconduct for any peace officer or other
officer or public employee to dispose of:
(i)  a notice to appear; or
(ii)  traffic citation.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) do not apply if the disposal is done
with the consent of the magistrate before whom the arrested person was to
appear.
(2) A person who cancels or solicits the cancellation of a notice to appear or
a traffic citation, in any manner other than as provided by law, is guilty of
a class B misdemeanor.
